California, session 20252026, AB1783.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 16643) is added to Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, to read: CHAPTER 5.5. Prohibition on Use of State Funds16643. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, including any provision of the annual Budget Act or any other statute making an appropriation, a state agency shall not expend funds for the study, planning, testing, design, implementation, administration, or evaluation of a tax, fee, assessment, or charge based on vehicle miles traveled.(b) Any funds appropriated from the General Fund to another fund for the purposes described in subdivision (a) that remain unencumbered as of January 1, 2027, shall revert to the General Fund to the extent permissible by law.(c) Any encumbered but unexpended funds for the purposes described in subdivision (a) shall be deobligated to the extent permissible by law and returned to the General Fund.(d) The Department of Finance shall, within 60 days of January 1, 2027, identify all appropriations subject to this section and ensure their reversion or transfer pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c).(e) Any future Budget Act shall not appropriate funds for the purposes described in subdivision (a) unless expressly authorized by statute that is enacted after January 1, 2027, and that specifically references this section.SECTION 1.SEC. 2. Chapter 1.2 (commencing with Section 7283.61) is added to Part 1.7 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read: CHAPTER 1.2. Vehicle Miles Traveled Tax7283.61. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, a city, county, or any political subdivision thereof, shall not impose, administer, collect, or enforce a vehicle miles traveled tax or a mileage-based tax.(b) For purposes of this section, a “vehicle miles traveled tax” or “mileage-based tax” means a tax, fee, assessment, or charge that is calculated, in whole or in part, based on the number of miles traveled by a motor vehicle, and shall include, but not be limited to, any tax, fee, assessment, or charge that is:(1) Directly assessed per mile traveled.(2) Calculated using odometer readings, telematics data, Global Positioning System (GPS) data, or any similar mileage-tracking method.(3) Imposed as a replacement for, supplement to, or offset of fuel excise taxes, registration fees, or other transportation-related charges.(c) This section does not prohibit the collection of tolls for the use of specific facilities, provided the tolls are not calculated based on total vehicle miles traveled beyond the tolled facility.(d) Any program, pilot program, regulation, or administrative action inconsistent with this section is void and unenforceable.SEC. 2.SEC. 3. The Legislature finds and declares that Section 1 of this act adding Section 7283.61 of the Revenue and Taxation Code address a matter of statewide concern rather than a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, Section 1 of this act applies to all cities, including charter cities.